Utah statutes.
26-4-19.   Personal property of deceased -- Disposition.
(1)  Personal property of the deceased not held as evidence shall be turned
over to the legal representative of the deceased within 30 days after
completion of the investigation of the death of the deceased. If no legal
representative is known, the county attorney, district attorney, or the
medical examiner shall, within 30 days after the investigation, turn the
personal property over to the county treasurer to be handled pursuant to the
escheat laws.
(2)  An affidavit shall be filed with the county treasurer by the county
attorney, district attorney, or the medical examiner within 30 days after
investigation of the death of the deceased showing the money or other property
belonging to the estate of the deceased person which has come into his
possession and the disposition made of the property.
(3)  Property required to be turned over to the legal representative of the
deceased may be held longer than 30 days if, in the opinion of the county
attorney, district attorney, or attorney general, the property is necessary
evidence in a court proceeding. Upon conclusion of the court proceedings, the
personal property shall be turned over as described in this section and in
accordance with the rules of the court.
